Maine, session 132, LD371.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶B-3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 477, §1, is
further amended to read:
B-3. "Renewable capacity resource" means a source of electrical generation:
(1) Whose total power production capacity does not exceed 100 megawatts and
relies on one or more of the following:
(a) Fuel cells;
(b) Tidal power;
(d) Geothermal installations;
(e) Hydroelectric generators that meet all state and federal fish passage
requirements applicable to the generator;
(f) Biomass generators that are fueled by wood, wood waste or landfill gas; or
(g) Anaerobic digestion of by-products of waste from animals or agricultural
crops, food or vegetative material, algae or organic refuse; or
(2) That relies on wind power installations or solar power installations.; or
(3) That relies on hydroelectric generators that meet all state and federal fish
passage requirements applicable to the generator.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2009, c. 542, §5, is
further amended to read:
C. "Renewable resource" means a source of electrical generation:
(1) That qualifies as a small power production facility under the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission rules, 18 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 292, Subpart
B, as in effect on January 1, 1997; or
(2) Whose total power production capacity does not exceed 100 megawatts and
that relies on one or more of the following:
(a) Fuel cells;
(b) Tidal power;
(c) Solar arrays and installations;
(d) Wind power installations;
(e) Geothermal installations;
(f) Hydroelectric generators;
(g) Biomass generators that are fueled by wood or wood waste, landfill gas or
anaerobic digestion of agricultural products, by-products or wastes; or
(h) Generators fueled by municipal solid waste in conjunction with recycling.;
or
(3) That relies on hydroelectric generators.
Page 1 - 132LR0804(01)

Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §635-A, first ¶, as affected by PL 1989, c. 890, Pt. A, §40 and
amended by Pt. B, §185, is further amended to read:
Whenever the commissioner receives a properly completed application, the department
shall make a decision as expeditiously as possible, but no later than 6 months from the date
that the department receives the application.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §636, first ¶, as affected by PL 1989, c. 890, Pt. A, §40 and
amended by Pt. B, §187, is further amended to read:
The department shall approve a project when it the department finds that the applicant
has demonstrated that the following criteria and application requirements have been met.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §636, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 458, §18, is amended to
read:
3. Public benefits. The project will result in significant economic benefits to the
public, including, but not limited to, the creation of employment opportunities for the
construction and operation of the hydropower project for workers of the State.
Sec. 6. 38 MRSA §636, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Public engagement. The applicant has held at least one public meeting, in the
municipality in which the proposed hydropower project may be located, to receive input
from the public. The application must include a summary of input received from the public
at the meeting.
Sec. 7. 38 MRSA §636, sub-§7, ¶B, as amended by PL 2009, c. 561, §39, is further
amended to read:
B. Whether the project will result in significant benefit or harm to fish and wildlife
resources. In making its determination, the department shall consider other existing
uses of the watershed and fisheries management plans adopted by the Department of
Inland Fisheries and Wildlife and the Department of Marine Resources and may
consider the applicant's proposed use of technologies to improve fish passage and
protect wildlife resources;
Sec. 8. 38 MRSA §639 is enacted to read:
§639. Operational capacity
Subject to the requirements of this subarticle and other applicable laws and rules, an
approved hydropower project may operate at its full nameplate capacity as defined in Title
35-A, section 3481, subsection 11.